Rhode Island, session 2026, HB8427.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 39-3 of the General Laws entitled "Regulatory Powers of
Administration" is hereby amended by adding thereto the following section:
39-3-37.4. Informational notice on gas bills -- Gas distribution company.
(a) Every gas distribution company that shall charge for the distribution of natural gas to
any house, building, tenement, or estate shall conspicuously display upon the bill or statement for
any customer the following information:
(1) The total number of therms consumed;
(2) The total cost of distributing the gas to the customer;
(3) The customer charge;
(4) Conservation costs;
(5) All applicable credits;
(6) Charges that support low-income gas customers;
(7) Applicable taxes; and
(8) All other costs, charges, or fees added to the bill or statement.
(b) The gas distribution company shall issue a single bill for gas service to all customers in
its service territory.
(c) For purposes of this section, "conspicuously display" means including a visual
illustration showing each component of the utility bill and the cost associated with each component

including, but not limited to, supply, distribution, ratepayer funded programs and policy, taxes and
all other costs. The division shall have the authority to approve or deny the adequacy of the format
chosen by the company for compliance with this provision.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC006311
========
LC006311 - Page 2 of 3